North Carolina, session 2025, SB623.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 95-98 reads as rewritten:
"§ 95-98. Contracts between units of government and labor unions, trade unions or labor
organizations concerning public employees declared to be illegal.
(a) Any Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, any agreement, or contract,
between the governing authority of any city, town, county, or other municipality, or between any
agency, unit, or instrumentality thereof, or between any agency, instrumentality, or institution of
the State of North Carolina, and any labor union, trade union, or labor organization, as bargaining
agent for any public employees of such city, town, county or other municipality, or agency or
instrumentality of government, is hereby declared to be against the public policy of the State,
illegal, unlawful, void and of no effect.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, first responders may bargain
collectively with the governing authority of any city, town, county, or other municipality. This
section does not affect the prohibition on strikes under G.S. 95-98.1."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S623-v-1*